South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3797.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-9-198.  All firefighters, including volunteer firefighters, must be tested annually to determine whether perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances are present in their bloodstreams. The State Fire Marshal shall promulgate regulations to implement and enforce the provisions contained in this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----